Massachusetts, session 194th, H1116.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 113O the
following section:-
Section 113O½. For purposes of this section, an insurance payment received for a motor
vehicle that has been stolen and not recovered shall be treated as a trade-in credit when applied
toward the purchase of a replacement motor vehicle; provided, that: (i) the stolen vehicle has
been reported to law enforcement and remains unrecovered by the time of the replacement
vehicle purchase; and (ii) the insurance payment is applied toward the purchase of the
replacement vehicle. The insured shall provide to the seller of the replacement motor vehicle
documentation from the insurance company indicating the amount of the insurance payment and
confirmation that the payment was for a stolen and unrecovered vehicle, which shall be sufficient
documentation for the purposes of this section and for the purposes of any excise tax. The sales
price of the replacement vehicle subject to tax shall be the difference between the total sales
of 2

price of the replacement vehicle and the amount of the insurance payment that shall include any
excise tax, provided that such difference shall not be less than 0.
of 2